Utah statutes.
62A-4a-111.   Fraudulently obtained services -- Recovery.

If it is discovered that a person is fraudulently obtaining, or has fraudulently obtained, services offered by the division in accordance with this chapter, the division shall take all necessary steps, including legal action through the attorney general, to recover all money or the value of services fraudulently obtained.  The division may establish an agreement with the Office of Recovery Services to fulfill the requirements of this section.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 260, 1994 General Session

